sv: Korg - material: Bambu; Kanvas; Bomull; Tyg; Fuskläder; Filt; Hampa; Jute; Läder; Mesh; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Rattan; Gummi; Syntetisk; Vinyl; Korg; Ylle; Övrigt
tr: Basket malzemesi: Bambu; Tuval; Pamuk; Kumaşlar; Suni deri; Keçe; Kenevir; Jüt; Deri; Ağ; Metal; Plastik; Plastik; Poliyester; Hint kamışı; Kauçuk; Sentetik; Vinil; Hasır; Yünlüler; Diğer
pl: Materiał kosza: Bambus; Płótno; Bawełna; Tkanina; Skaj; Filc; Konopie; Juta; Skórzane; Siatka; Metal; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliester; Rattan; Guma; Syntetyczne; Winyl; Wiklina; Wełna; Inne
ro-RO: Material coș: Bamboo; Pânză; Bumbac; Stofă; Imitație de piele; Pâslă; Cânepă; Iută; Piele; Plasă; Metal; Nailon; Plastic; Poliester; Ratan; Cauciuc; Sintetic; Vinil; Răchită; Lână; Altele
pt-BR: Material da cesta: Bambu; Tela; Algodão; Tecido; Couro falso; Sentido; Cânhamo; Juta; Couro; Malha; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Rattan; Borracha; Sintético; Vinil; Vime; Lã; Outro
bg-BG: Материал на коша: Бамбук; Брезент; Памук; Плат; Изкуствена кожа; Филц; Коноп; Юта; Кожа; Мрежа; Метал; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиестер; Ратан; Каучук; Синтетичен; Винил; Ракита; Вълна; Други
zh-CN: 篮筐材质: 竹子; 画布; 棉布; 面料/布料; 人造皮革; 毛毡; 麻; 黄麻; 皮革; 网状; 金属; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 藤条; 橡胶; 合成; 乙烯基贴纸; 柳条; 羊毛; 其他
ru: Материал корзины: Бамбук; Холщовая ткань; Хлопок; Ткань; Искусственная кожа; Фетр; Конопля; Джут; Кожа; Сетка; Металл; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиэстер; Ротанг; Резина; Синтетика; Винил; Плетенка; Шерсть; Другое
it: Materiale da basket: Bamboo; Tela; Cotone; Tessuto; Ecopelle; Feltro; Canapa; Iuta; Pelle; Mesh; Metallo; Nylon; Plastica; Poliestere; Rattan; Gomma; Sintetico; Vinile; Vimini; Lana; Altro
nb: Kurvmateriale: Bambus; Lerret; Bomull; Stoff; Kunstig lær; Filt; Hamp; Jute; Skinn; Mesh; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Rotting; Gummi; Syntetisk; Vinyl; Flettet; Ull; Annet
el: Υλικό καλαθιού: Μπαμπού; Καμβάς; Βαμβάκι; Ύφασμα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Τσόχα; Καννάβι; Γιούτα; Δέρμα; Πλέγμα; Μέταλλο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Ρατάν; Καουτσούκ; Συνθετικό; Βινύλιο; Ψάθα; Μαλλί; Άλλο
de: Korbmaterial: Bambus; Leinwand; Baumwolle; Stoff; Kunstleder; Filz; Hanf; Jute; Leder; Netz; Metall; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyester; Rattan; Gummi; Synthetisch; Vinyl; Korbgeflecht; Wolle; Sonstiges
ja: バスケット材質: バンブー; キャンバス; コットン; 布・生地; フェイクレザー; フェルト; 麻; ジュート; レザー; メッシュ; 金属; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリエステル; 籐; ゴム; 合成品; ビニール; 藤; ウール; その他
lt-LT: Krepšio medžiaga: Bambukas; Drobė; Medvilnė; Audinys; Dirbtinė oda; Veltinis; Kanapių pluoštas; Džiutas; Oda; Tinklelis; Metalas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliesteris; Ratanas; Kaučiukas; Sintetika; Vinilas; Vytelės; Vilna; Kita
pt-PT: Material da cesta: Bambu; Tela; Algodão; Tecido; Couro falso; Feltro; Cânhamo; Juta; Pele; Rede; Metal; Náilon; Plástico; Poliéster; Ratim; Borracha; Sintético; Vinil; Vime; Lã; Outro
vi: Vật liệu giỏ: Tre; Toan; Vải bông; Vải; Da giả; Nỉ; Cây gai dầu; Sợi đay; Da; Lưới; Kim loại; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyester; Cây mây; Cao su; Tổng hợp; Nhựa vinyl; Mây; Len; Khác
cs: Materiál koše: Bambus; Plátno; Bavlna; Látky; Nepravá kůže; Plst; Konopí; Juta; Kůže; Síťovina; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Ratan; Guma; Syntetické; Vinylové; Proutěné; Vlna; Jiné
fi: Korin materiaali: Bambu; Kanvaasi; Puuvilla; Kangas; Keinonahka; Huopa; Hamppu; Juutti; Nahka; Verkko; Metalli; Nailon; Muovi; Polyesteri; Rottinki; Kumi; Synteettinen; Vinyyli; Kori; Villa; Muu
en: Basket material: Bamboo; Canvas; Cotton; Fabric; Faux leather; Felt; Hemp; Jute; Leather; Mesh; Metal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Rattan; Rubber; Synthetic; Vinyl; Wicker; Wool; Other
nl: Materiaal mand: Bamboe; Canvas; Katoen; Stof; Kunstleer; Vilt; Hennep; Jute; Leer; Gaas; Metaal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Rotan; Rubber; Synthetisch; Vinyl; Vlechtwerk; Wol; Andere
da: Kurvemateriale: Bambus; Lærred; Bomuld; Stof; Kunstigt læder; Filt; Hamp; Jute; Læder; Mesh; Metal; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Rattan; Gummi; Syntetisk; Vinyl; Wicker; Uld; Andet
zh-TW: 籃子材質: 竹子; 帆布; 棉布; 布料; 人造皮; 毛氈; 大麻; 黃麻; 皮製; 網布; 金屬; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚酯; 藤; 橡膠; 合成; 乙烯基; 柳條; 羊毛; 其他
ko: 바구니 소재: 대나무; 캔버스; 면; 패브릭; 인조 가죽; 펠트; 대마; 주트; 가죽; 메쉬; 금속; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 등나무; 고무; 인조; 비닐; 고리버들; 울; 기타
hr-HR: Materijal košare: Bambus; Platno; Pamuk; Tkanina; Umjetna koža; Filc; Konoplja; Juta; Koža; Mrežica; Metal; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Ratan; Guma; Sintetika; Vinil; Pruće; Vuna; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál košíka: Bambus; Plátno; Bavlna; Tkanina; Umelá koža; Plsť; Konope; Juta; Koža; Sieťovina; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Ratan; Guma; Syntetický; Vinyl; Prútený; Vlna; Iné
fr: Matériau du panier: Bambou; Toiles; Coton; Tissu; Faux cuir; Feutre; Chanvre; Jute; Cuir; A mailles; Métal; Nylon; Plastique; Polyester; Rattan; Caoutchouc; Synthétique; Vinyl; Osier; Laine; Autre
es: Material de la cesta: Bambú; Lienzo; Algodón; Tejido; Cuero sintético; Fieltro; Cáñamo; Yute; Cuero; Malla; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Ratán; Goma; Sintético; Vinilo; Mimbre; Lana; Otros
hu: Kosár anyaga: Bambusz; Vászon; Pamut; Szövet; Műbőr; Filc; Kender; Juta; Bőr; Hálós; Fém; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliészter; Rattan; Gumi; Szintetikus; Vinil; Fonott; Gyapjú; Egyéb
th: วัสดุสำหรับตะกร้า: ไผ่; ผ้าใบ; สำลี; ผ้า; หนังเทียม; ผ้าสักหลาด; กัญชง; ใยปอ; หนัง; ตาข่าย; โลหะ; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; หวาย; ยาง; สังเคราะห์; ไวนิล; เครื่องสาน; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Material za košaro: Bambus; Platno; Bombaž; Tkanina; Umetno usnje; Filc; Konoplja; Juta; Usnje; Mreža; Kovina; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Ratan; Guma; Sintetika; Vinil; Protje; Volna; Drugo